Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 1

General Provisions

53-10-101. “Legend Drugs” defined.

For the purpose of this part, “legend drugs” means any item that federal law prohibits dispensing without a prescription from a licensed doctor, dentist, optometrist or veterinarian.

This definition of legend drugs shall not be construed to include blood and blood fractions.

Acts 1939, ch. 164, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6632.24 (Williams, § 6632.6); Acts 1955, ch. 89, § 1; 1959, ch. 52, § 1; 1971, ch. 163, § 43; 1980, ch. 710, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1201; Acts 1993, ch. 295, § 7.

Cross-References. Examination, diagnosis, management and treatment of eyes by optometrists, §§ 63-8-102, 63-8-112.

Legend drug and controlled substance research, title 53, ch. 14.

Wholesalers of controlled substances, title 53, ch. 10, part 3.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure (William D. Warren), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1179.

Comparative Legislation. Prescription drugs:

Ala. Code § 20-2-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 5-64-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 16-13-1 et seq., § 26-4-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 217.905 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 41-29-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 195.005 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 90-86 et seq.

Va. Code § 54.1-3400 et seq.

Cited: Bailey v. Johnson, 48 F.3d 965, 1995 FED App. 78P, 1995 U.S. App. LEXIS 4248 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1995); State v. Headley, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 817 (Tenn. Crim. App. Sept. 29, 2009); Yafai v. Metro. Beer Permit Bd. of Metro. Gov't, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 190 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 10, 2010).

53-10-102. Application of part.

There are exempted from this part:

The sale of legend drugs by legitimate wholesale druggists to registered pharmacists and the sale by registered pharmacists to duly licensed physicians, dentists and veterinarians; and

The sale of legend drugs by registered pharmacists to duly licensed optometrists and the possession and use of legend drugs by duly licensed optometrists as authorized by § 63-8-102.

This part shall apply to the state of Tennessee, its departments, agencies and employees and to the political subdivisions of the state and their departments, agencies and employees, except the department of health and local health departments, which shall be subject to § 63-10-405.

Acts 1939, ch. 164, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6632.24 (Williams, § 6632.6); Acts 1955, ch. 89, § 1; 1971, ch. 163, § 43; 1975, ch. 116, § 2; 1982, ch. 673, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1202.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of information provided to pharmacy peer review committee, § 63-10-405.

Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

53-10-103. Enforcement — Rules and regulations — Fines.

The board of pharmacy has the power to enforce this part and shall make rules and regulations for its enforcement.

All fines collected under the enforcement of this part shall be paid to the board and deposited to the state treasury as other funds received by the board.

Acts 1939, ch. 164, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6632.24 (Williams, § 6632.6); Acts 1961, ch. 101, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed), § 52-1203.

53-10-104. Selling, bartering, giving away or obtaining legend drugs.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to possess, sell, barter or give away any drug known as a legend drug, as defined in § 53-10-101, except upon the written prescription of a duly licensed physician; certified physician assistant; nurse authorized pursuant to § 63-6-204 or § 63-9-113, who is rendering service under the supervision, control and responsibility of a licensed physician, and who meets the requirements pursuant to § 63-7-123; a dentist; an optometrist authorized pursuant to § 63-8-102(12); or a veterinarian, and compounded or dispensed by a duly registered pharmacist.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to obtain or to attempt to obtain a legend drug, or to procure or to attempt to procure the administration of a legend drug, by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, subterfuge, forgery, alteration of a prescription, by the concealment of a material fact, or by the use of a false name or address.

Under no circumstances shall a nurse practitioner who has met the additional requirements of § 63-7-207(14) to write and sign prescriptions or issue drugs, nor a physician assistant working under a physician's supervision, be delegated the authority to prescribe drugs, whose sole purpose is to cause or perform an abortion, that involve the following:

The writing or signing a prescription for any drug or medication;

The dispensing or administration of any prescribed or legend drug or medication; or

The performing of any procedure that involves the use of a legend drug or medication.

Acts 1939, ch. 164, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6632.24 (Williams, § 6632.6); Acts 1953, ch. 52, § 1; 1955, ch. 89, § 1; 1961, ch. 6, § 1; 1963, ch. 369, §§ 1, 4; 1971, ch. 163, § 43; 1980, ch. 851, § 8; 1980, ch. 858, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1204; Acts 1987, ch. 217, § 3; 1994, ch. 569, § 4; 1994, ch. 722, § 3; 1994, ch. 853, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 754, § 1; 1997, ch. 507, § 1; 2000, ch. 541, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 507, § 4 provides that nothing in that act, which deleted former subdivision (a)(2) and added § 63-7-123(b)(2) ) (now (b)(2)(A)), shall apply to the practice of nurse anesthesia.

Cross-References. Physician assistants, §§ 63-19-106, 63-19-107.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure (Robert E. Kendrick), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1220.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of §§ 53-10-104 and 53-10-105, OAG 99-172 (9/2/99).

Cited: State v. Manning, 490 S.W.2d 512, 1973 Tenn. LEXIS 521 (Tenn. 1973); Manning v. Jarnigan, 387 F. Supp. 791, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11497 (E.D. Tenn. 1974); Manning v. Jarnigan, 501 F.2d 408, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 7407 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1974); Bailey v. Johnson, 48 F.3d 965, 1995 FED App. 78P, 1995 U.S. App. LEXIS 4248 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1995); State v. Stinnett, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 570 (Tenn. Crim. App. July 2, 2008); State v. Headley, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 817 (Tenn. Crim. App. Sept. 29, 2009).

53-10-105. Possession without prescription unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person to have in the person's possession, any drug defined or enumerated in this part, without the drug having been prescribed by a duly licensed physician, certified physician assistant, dentist, optometrist authorized pursuant to § 63-8-102(12), or veterinarian, and having been dispensed by a pharmacy duly licensed and registered in this state, unless the person was a resident of another state and had the prescription filled by a duly licensed and registered pharmacist of the other state.

This section does not apply to authorized agents and representatives of pharmaceutical manufacturers, firms or wholesalers.

Nothing in this section applies to a licensed physician, certified physician assistant, dentist, optometrist authorized pursuant to § 63-8-102(12), or veterinarian, nor to the drugs under the control of the physician, certified physician assistant, dentist, optometrist authorized pursuant to § 63-8-102(12), or veterinarian in the practice of that person's profession, and the exemption includes a nurse authorized pursuant to § 63-6-204 or § 63-9-113, who is rendering service under the supervision, control and responsibility of a licensed physician, and who meets the requirements pursuant to § 63-7-207(13).

Acts 1955, ch. 89, § 1; 1963, ch. 369, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A., § 52-1206; Acts 1987, ch. 217, § 4; 1987, ch. 244, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1994, ch. 722, § 4; 1996, ch. 754, § 2; 2000, ch. 541, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Physician assistants, §§ 63-19-106, 63-19-107.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1963 Tennessee Survey (Robert E. Kendrick), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 977.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of §§ 53-10-104 and 53-10-105, OAG 99-172 (9/2/99).

Cited: Manning v. Jarnigan, 501 F.2d 408, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 7407 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1974); State v. Headley, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 817 (Tenn. Crim. App. Sept. 29, 2009); State v. Christopher, — S.W.3d —, 2013 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 230 (Tenn. Crim. App. Mar. 14, 2013).

53-10-106. Adulterated drugs or devices.

Any drug or device that is misbranded, out of date, old, deteriorated, not kept under proper refrigeration as required, or that has been exposed to fire, heat, smoke, water, flood or windstorm damage is deemed to be adulterated, and the possession, sale or distribution of those drugs or devices is prohibited.

Any drug or device that is deemed misbranded or adulterated by federal law is deemed misbranded or adulterated within the purview of this section.

The drugs or devices listed in subsection (a) are subject to seizure and subsequent destruction unless specifically exempted by the board of pharmacy.

Prior to the destruction of any drugs or devices deemed to be adulterated, the owner or person in legal possession of the drugs or devices shall be given written notice of the intent to destroy the drug or device and the reason for the destruction.

The owner or person in legal possession shall have ten (10) days from the receipt of the written notice to request in writing a hearing to show cause to the board why the drugs or devices are not within the purview of this section.

Acts 1973, ch. 110, § 14; T.C.A., § 52-1209.

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed state law allowing the donation of expired legend or prescription drugs to non-profit organizations which would distribute those drugs to low income recipients would violate federal law, OAG 06-057 (3/28/06).

53-10-107. Fines and fees to be paid to board of pharmacy.

All fines and fees received in the regulation and enforcement of this part shall be paid to the secretary-treasurer of the board of pharmacy.

Acts 1965, ch. 271, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-1207.

53-10-108. Violation — Penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation possessing, selling, bartering or giving away any drug in violation of this part or violating any other provision of this part commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1972, ch. 597, § 8; T.C.A., § 52-1208; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Cited: McLean v. State, 527 S.W.2d 76, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 635 (Tenn. 1975).

53-10-109. Prescription of certain stimulants for weight control prohibited.

No amphetamine classified as a Schedule II stimulant under § 39-17-408(d) shall be prescribed for the purpose of assisting a patient to gain or lose weight.

A violation of this section is a ground for license denial, suspension or revocation.

Acts 1990, ch. 934, § 1.

53-10-110. Contents of label — Damages in civil action.

Any person dispensing a legend drug for a patient shall include on the label of the container in which the legend drug is dispensed the indication or indications for which the drug is being prescribed if requested by the prescriber, patient, or patient's caregiver and the prescriber, patient, or patient's caregiver provides the indication or indications to the person dispensing the legend drug.

Any person dispensing a legend drug shall not be liable in any civil action for any alleged injury resulting solely from:

Failing to include the indication or indications on the label when not requested to do so by the prescriber, patient or patient's caregiver; or

Reasonably relying upon the prescriber, patient or patient's caregiver in obtaining the indication or indications included on the label.

No prescriber shall be liable for damages in any civil action solely:

For refusing a patient or patient's caregiver's request to the prescriber that the prescriber request that the dispenser provide the indication or indications on the label of the legend drug container;

Alleging any cause of action for violation of the patient's privacy for complying with a patient or the patient's caregiver's request that the prescriber request that the dispenser provide the indication or indications on the label of the legend drug container; or

For any incorrect information placed on the label of any legend drug by the dispenser pursuant to the terms of this section unless the dispenser only relied on information provided by the prescriber.

This section shall not apply to prescriptions dispensed for inpatients of a hospital, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201 or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33 or individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility.

Nothing in this section shall limit in any manner the civil liability of any person guilty of willful or wanton misconduct, gross negligence, reckless conduct or criminal conduct.

Acts 2008, ch. 936, § 1; 2011, ch. 166, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 936, § 2 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Improving Patient Safety through Medication Use Prescription Labeling Act of 2008.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (a), substituted “legend drug for a patient” for “legend drug for an elder person” and deleted the former last sentence which read: “For purposes of this section, ‘elder person’ means any person who is sixty (60) years of age or older.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 936, § 3. July 1, 2008.

Acts 2011, ch. 166, § 2. July 1, 2011.

53-10-111. Requirements for filling prescriptions of prescribers who have died.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, when a pharmacist becomes aware that a healthcare practitioner authorized to prescribe by the law of this state has died, a prescription issued by the practitioner may continue to be dispensed based on the pharmacist's professional judgment and in accordance with the following requirements:

If the prescription is a new prescription that has not been previously dispensed, it may be dispensed within ninety (90) days of the date on which the practitioner has died;

If the prescription has been previously dispensed and has valid authorization to be refilled, the refills may be dispensed but not for a period of more than ninety (90) days from the date on which the practitioner died for Schedule III, IV and V drugs and one hundred eighty (180) days from the date on which the practitioner died for non-scheduled drugs; and

Nothing in this section shall authorize the dispensing of a prescription that was issued for a controlled substance unless permitted by the federal Controlled Substances Act and regulations of the federal drug enforcement administration.

These provisions shall not apply to a schedule II controlled substance.

Acts 2010, ch. 767, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Controlled Substance Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 21 U.S.C. § 801 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 767, § 2. July 1, 2010.

53-10-112. Prevention of abuse of drugs dispensed by pharmacist.

For purposes of this section:

“Pharmacist” has the same meaning as defined in § 63-10-204; and

“Pharmacy” has the same meaning as defined in § 63-10-204.

A pharmacy owner, manager or operator shall respect the professional judgment of the pharmacist in holding the health and safety of a patient to be their first consideration.

A pharmacist shall, by utilizing education, skill, experience and professional judgment, make every reasonable effort to prevent the abuse of drugs which the pharmacist dispenses. In doing so, a pharmacist may decline to dispense to a patient a legend drug which in that pharmacist's professional judgment, lacks a therapeutic value for the patient or which is not for a legitimate medical purpose.

A pharmacist shall not be subject to any penalty or fine when fulfilling the pharmacist's obligation to uphold the health and safety of a patient which results in the pharmacist declining to dispense any legend drug.

It shall be a Class A misdemeanor, punishable by fine only, for the owner, manager or operator of a pharmacy to knowingly restrict or interfere with, or knowingly require a protocol or procedure that restricts or interferes with, a pharmacist's professional duty to counsel with patients and to evaluate the patients' appropriate pharmaceutical needs and the exercise of the pharmacist's professional judgment as to whether it is appropriate to dispense a legend drug to a patient.

Acts 2013, ch. 276, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 276, § 2. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, part 2.

Law Reviews.

The Right Hammer for the Right Nail: Public Health Tools in the Struggle Between Pain and Addiction, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1300 (Summer 2018).

53-10-113. Off-label drug use.

As used in this section, and unless the context otherwise requires:

“Misbranding” means either the federal definition under 21 U.S.C. § 352 or drugs or devices that are misbranded under § 53-10-106; and

“Off-label” means the use of a United States food and drug administration (FDA) approved drug, biological product, or device other than the use or uses approved by the FDA.

A pharmaceutical manufacturer or its representatives may engage in truthful promotion of off-label uses.

This section does not require a health insurance entity, as defined in § 56-7-109, other third-party payer, or other health plan sponsor to provide coverage for the cost of any off-label treatment. A health insurance entity, other third-party payer, or other health plan sponsor may provide coverage for an off-label treatment.

Notwithstanding any other law, no official, employee, or agent of this state shall enforce or apply § 53-10-106(a)(2) against or otherwise prosecute a pharmaceutical manufacturer or its representatives for engaging in truthful promotion of off-label uses.

Notwithstanding any other law, no state regulatory board may revoke, fail to renew or take any other action against a pharmaceutical manufacturer's or representative's, healthcare institution's, or physician's license solely for engaging in truthful promotion of off-label uses.

Acts 2018, ch. 893, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 893 § 2. July 1, 2018.